Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.20.020

Authorized sentences for crimes committed before July 1, 1984.

(1) Felony. Every person convicted of a classified felony shall be punished as follows:

(a) For a class A felony, by imprisonment in a state correctional institution for a maximum term fixed by the court of not less than twenty years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than fifty thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine;

(b) For a class B felony, by imprisonment in a state correctional institution for a maximum term of not more than ten years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than twenty thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine;

(c) For a class C felony, by imprisonment in a state correctional institution for a maximum term of not more than five years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.

(2) Gross Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a gross misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than five thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.

(3) Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more than ninety days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than one thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.

(4) This section applies to only those crimes committed prior to July 1, 1984.

[ 2011 c 96 s 12; 1982 c 192 s 9; 1981 c 137 s 37; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.20.020.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.

Penalty assessments in addition to fine or bail forfeiture—Crime victim and witness programs in county: RCW 7.68.035.